de: Giftig: Gefahr ernster Gesundheitsschäden bei längerer Exposition durch Einatmen\, Berührung mit der Haut und durch Verschlucken, R48/23/24/25
en: Toxic: danger of serious damage to health by prolonged exposure through inhalation\, in contact with skin and if swallowed, R48/23/24/25
cs: Toxický : nebezpečí vážného poškození zdraví při dlouhodobé expozici vdechováním\, stykem s kůží a požíváním, R48/23/24/25
dk: Giftig: alvorlig sundhedsfare ved længere tids påvirkning ved indånding\, hudkontakt og indtagelse, R48/23/24/25
el: Τοξικό: κίνδυνος σοβαρής βλάβης της υγείας ύστερα από παρατε- ταµένη έκθεση όταν εισπνέεται\, σε επαφή µε το δέρµα και σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R48/23/24/25
es: Tóxico: riesgo de efectos graves para la salud en caso de exposición prolongada por inhalación\, contacto con la piel e ingestión, R48/23/24/25
et: Mürgine: tõsise tervisekahjustuse oht pikaajalisel sissehingamisel\, kokkupuutel nahaga ja allaneelamisel, R48/23/24/25
fi: Myrkyllistä: pitkäaikainen altistus voi aiheuttaa vakavaa haittaa terveydelle hengitettynä\, joutuessaan iholle ja nieltynä, R48/23/24/25
fr: Toxique: risque d'effets graves pour la santé en cas d'exposition prolongée par inhalation\, par contact avec la peau et par ingestion, R48/23/24/25
hu: Hosszabb időn át belélegezve\, bőrrel érintkezve és szájon keresztül a szervezetbe jutva mérgező: súlyos egészségkárosodást okozhat, R48/23/24/25
it: Tossico: pericolo di gravi danni alla salute in caso di esposizione prolungata per inalazione\, a contatto con la pelle e per ingestione, R48/23/24/25
lt: Toksiška: ilgą laiką pakartotinai įkvepiant\, veikiant per odą ir praryjant sukelia sunkius sveikatos sutrikimus, R48/23/24/25
lv: Toksisks – iespējams nopietns kaitējums veselībai pēc ilgstošas iedarbības ieelpojot\, nonākot saskarē ar ādu un norijot, R48/23/24/25
mt: Tossiku: periklu ta' ħsara serja lis-saħħa minn espożizzjoni ghat- tul minħabba xamm\, mess mal-ġilda jew jekk jinbela', R48/23/24/25
nl: Vergiftig: gevaar voor ernstige schade aan de gezondheid bij langdurige blootstelling bij inademing\, aanraking met de huid en opname door de mond, R48/23/24/25
no: Giftig: Alvorlig helsefare ved lengre tids påvirkning ved innånding\, hudkontakt og svelging, R48/23/24/25
pl: Działa toksycznie przez drogi oddechowe\, w kontakcie ze skórą i po połknięciu; stwarza poważne zagrożenie zdrowia w następstwie długotrwałego narażenia, R48/23/24/25
pt: Tóxico: risco de efeitos graves para a saúde em caso de exposição prolongada por inalação\, em contacto com a pele e por ingestão, R48/23/24/25
sk: Jedovatý \, nebezpečenstvo vážneho poškodenia zdravia dlhodobou expozíciou vdýchnutím\, pri kontakte s pokožkou a po požití, R48/23/24/25
sl: Strupeno: nevarnost hudih okvar zdravja zaradi dolgotrajnejšega vdihavanja\, stika s kožo in zauživanja, R48/23/24/25
sv: Giftigt: risk för allvarliga hälsoskador vid långvarig exponering genom inandning\, hudkontakt och förtäring, R48/23/24/25

de: Giftig: Gefahr ernster Gesundheitsschäden bei längerer Exposition durch Einatmen und durch Verschlucken, R48/23/25
en: Toxic: danger of serious damage to health by prolonged exposure through inhalation and if swallowed, R48/23/25
cs: Toxický : nebezpečí vážného poškození zdraví při dlouhodobé expozici vdechováním a požíváním, R48/23/25
dk: Giftig: alvorlig sundhedsfare ved længere tids påvirkning ved indånding og indtagelse, R48/23/25
el: Τοξικό: κίνδυνος σοβαρής βλάβης της υγείας ύστερα από παρατε- ταµένη έκθεση όταν εισπνέεται και σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R48/23/25
es: Tóxico: riesgo de efectos graves para la salud en caso de exposición prolongada por inhalación e ingestión, R48/23/25
et: Mürgine: tõsise tervisekahjustuse oht pikaajalisel sissehingamisel ja allaneelamisel, R48/23/25
fi: Myrkyllistä: pitkäaikainen altistus voi aiheuttaa vakavaa haittaa terveydelle hengitettynä ja nieltynä, R48/23/25
fr: Toxique: risque d'effets graves pour la santé en cas d'exposition prolongée par inhalation et par ingestion, R48/23/25
hu: Hosszabb időn át belélegezve és szájon keresztül a szervezetbe jutva mérgező: súlyos egészségkárosodást okozhat, R48/23/25
it: Tossico: pericolo di gravi danni alla salute in caso di esposizione prolungata per inalazione ed ingestione, R48/23/25
lt: Toksiška: ilgą laiką pakartotinai įkvepiant ir praryjant sukelia sunkius sveikatos sutrikimus, R48/23/25
lv: Toksisks – iespējams nopietns kaitējums veselībai pēc ilgstošas iedarbības ieelpojot un norijot, R48/23/25
mt: Tossiku: periklu ta' ħsara serja lis-saħħa minn espożizzjoni ghat- tul minħabba xamm u jekk jinbela', R48/23/25
nl: Vergiftig: gevaar voor ernstige schade aan de gezondheid bij langdurige blootstelling bij inademing en opname door de mond, R48/23/25
no: Giftig: Alvorlig helsefare ved lengre tids påvirkning ved innånding og svelging, R48/23/25
pl: Działa toksycznie przez drogi oddechowe i po połknięciu; stwarza poważne zagrożenie zdrowia w następstwie długotrwałego narażenia, R48/23/25
pt: Tóxico: risco de efeitos graves para a saúde em caso de exposição prolongada por inalação e ingestão, R48/23/25
sk: Jedovatý \, nebezpečenstvo vážneho poškodenia zdravia dlhodobou expozíciou vdýchnutím a po požití, R48/23/25
sl: Strupeno: nevarnost hudih okvar zdravja zaradi dolgotrajnejšega vdihavanja in zauživanja, R48/23/25
sv: Giftigt: risk för allvarliga hälsoskador vid långvarig exponering genom inandning och förtäring, R48/23/25

de: Giftig: Gefahr ernster Gesundheitsschäden bei längerer Exposition durch Berührung mit der Haut, R48/24
en: Toxic: danger of serious damage to health by prolonged exposure in contact with skin, R48/24
cs: Toxický : nebezpečí vážného poškození zdraví při dlouhodobé expozici stykem s kůží, R48/24
dk: Giftig: alvorlig sundhedsfare ved længere tids påvirkning ved hudkontakt, R48/24
el: Τοξικό: κίνδυνος σοβαρής βλάβης της υγείας ύστερα από παρατε- ταµένη έκθεση σε επαφή µε το δέρµα, R48/24
es: Tóxico: riesgo de efectos graves para la salud en caso de exposición prolongada por contacto con la piel, R48/24
et: Mürgine: tõsise tervisekahjustuse oht pikaajalisel kokkupuutel nahaga, R48/24
fi: Myrkyllistä: pitkäaikainen altistus voi aiheuttaa vakavaa haittaa terveydelle joutuessaan iholle, R48/24
fr: Toxique: risque d'effets graves pour la santé en cas d'exposition prolongée par contact avec la peau, R48/24
hu: Hosszabb időn át bőrrel érintkezve mérgező: súlyos egészségkárosodást okozhat, R48/24
it: Tossico: pericolo di gravi danni alla salute in caso di esposizione prolungata a contatto con la pelle, R48/24
lt: Toksiška: ilgą laiką pakartotinai veikiant per odą sukelia sunkius sveikatos sutrikimus, R48/24
lv: Toksisks – iespējams nopietns kaitējums veselībai pēc ilgstošas saskares ar ādu, R48/24
mt: Tossiku: periklu ta' ħsara serja lis-saħħa minn espożizzjoni ghat- tul għal mess mal-ġilda, R48/24
nl: Vergiftig: gevaar voor ernstige schade aan de gezondheid bij langdurige blootstelling bij aanraking met de huid, R48/24
no: Giftig: Alvorlig helsefare ved lengre tids påvirkning ved hudkontakt, R48/24
pl: Działa toksycznie w kontakcie ze skórą; stwarza poważne zagrożenie zdrowia w następstwie długotrwałego narażenia, R48/24
pt: Tóxico: risco de efeitos graves para a saúde em caso de exposição prolongada em contacto com a pele, R48/24
sk: Jedovatý \, nebezpečenstvo vážneho poškodenia zdravia dlhodobou expozíciou pri kontakte s pokožkou, R48/24
sl: Strupeno: nevarnost hudih okvar zdravja zaradi dolgotrajnejšega stika s kožo, R48/24
sv: Giftigt: risk för allvarliga hälsoskador vid långvarig exponering genom hudkontakt, R48/24

de: Giftig: Gefahr ernster Gesundheitsschäden bei längerer Exposition durch Berührung mit der Haut und durch Verschlucken, R48/24/25
en: Toxic: danger of serious damage to health by prolonged exposure in contact with skin and if swallowed, R48/24/25
cs: Toxický : nebezpečí vážného poškození zdraví při dlouhodobé expozici stykem s kůží a požíváním, R48/24/25
dk: Giftig: alvorlig sundhedsfare ved længere tids påvirkning ved hudkontakt og indtagelse, R48/24/25
el: Τοξικό: κίνδυνος σοβαρής βλάβης της υγείας ύστερα από παρατε- ταµένη έκθεση σε επαφή µε το δέρµα και σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R48/24/25
es: Tóxico: riesgo de efectos graves para la salud en caso de exposición prolongada por contacto con la piel e ingestión, R48/24/25
et: Mürgine: tõsise tervisekahjustuse oht pikaajalisel kokkupuutel nahaga ja allaneelamisel, R48/24/25
fi: Myrkyllistä: pitkäaikainen altistus voi aiheuttaa vakavaa haittaa terveydelle joutuessaan iholle ja nieltynä, R48/24/25
fr: Toxique: risque d'effets graves pour la santé en cas d'exposition prolongée par contact avec la peau et par ingestion, R48/24/25
hu: Hosszabb időn át bőrrel érintkezve és szájon keresztül a szervezetbe jutva mérgező: súlyos egészségkárosodást okozhat, R48/24/25
it: Tossico: pericolo di danni gravi alla salute in caso di esposizione prolungata a contatto con la pelle e per ingestione, R48/24/25
lt: Toksiška: ilgą laiką pakartotinai veikiant per odą ir praryjant sukelia sunkius sveikatos sutrikimus, R48/24/25
lv: Toksisks – iespējams nopietns kaitējums veselībai pēc ilgstošas saskares ar ādu un norijot, R48/24/25
mt: Tossiku: periklu ta' ħsara serja lis-saħħa minn espożizzjoni ghat- tul għal mess mal-ġilda u jekk jinbela', R48/24/25
nl: Vergiftig: gevaar voor ernstige schade aan de gezondheid bij langdurige blootstelling bij aanraking met de huid en opname door de mond, R48/24/25
no: Giftig: Alvorlig helsefare ved lengre tids påvirkning ved hudkontakt og svelging, R48/24/25
pl: Działa toksycznie w kontakcie ze skórą i po połknięciu; stwarza poważne zagrożenie zdrowia w następstwie długotrwałego narażenia, R48/24/25
pt: Tóxico: risco de efeitos graves para a saúde em caso de exposição prolongada por contacto com a pele e por ingestão, R48/24/25
sk: Jedovatý \, nebezpečenstvo vážneho poškodenia zdravia dlhodobou expozíciou pri kontakte s pokožkou a po požití, R48/24/25
sl: Strupeno: nevarnost hudih okvar zdravja zaradi dolgotrajnejšega stika s kožo in zauživanja, R48/24/25
sv: Giftigt: risk för allvarliga hälsoskador vid långvarig exponering genom hudkontakt och förtäring, R48/24/25

de: Giftig: Gefahr ernster Gesundheitsschäden bei längerer Exposition durch Verschlucken, R48/25
en: Toxic: danger of serious damage to health by prolonged exposure if swallowed, R48/25
cs: Toxický : nebezpečí vážného poškození zdraví při dlouhodobé expozici požíváním, R48/25
dk: Giftig: alvorlig sundhedsfare ved længere tids påvirkning ved indtagelse, R48/25
el: Τοξικό: κίνδυνος σοβαρής βλάβης της υγείας ύστερα από παρατε- ταµένη έκθεση σε περίπτωση καταπόσεως, R48/25
es: Tóxico: riesgo de efectos graves para la salud en caso de exposición prolongada por ingestión, R48/25
et: Mürgine: tõsise tervisekahjustuse oht pikaajalisel allaneelamisel, R48/25
fi: Myrkyllistä: pitkäaikainen altistus voi aiheuttaa vakavaa haittaa terveydelle nieltynä, R48/25
fr: Toxique: risque d'effets graves pour la santé en cas d'exposition prolongée par ingestion, R48/25
hu: Szájon keresztül hosszabb időn át a szervezetbe jutva mérgező: súlyos egészségkárosodást okozhat, R48/25
it: Tossico: pericolo di gravi danni alla salute in caso di esposizione prolungata per ingestione, R48/25
lt: Toksiška: ilgą laiką pakartotinai praryjant sukelia sunkius sveikatos sutrikimus, R48/25
lv: Toksisks – iespējams nopietns kaitējums veselībai pēc ilgstošas iedarbības norijot, R48/25
mt: Tossiku: periklu ta' ħsara serja lis-saħħa minn espożizzjoni ghat- tul jekk jinbela', R48/25
nl: Vergiftig: gevaar voor ernstige schade aan de gezondheid bij langdurige blootstelling bij opname door de mond, R48/25
no: Giftig: Alvorlig helsefare ved lengre tids påvirkning ved svelging, R48/25
pl: Działa toksycznie po połknięciu; stwarza poważne zagrożenie zdrowia w następstwie długotrwałego narażenia, R48/25
pt: Tóxico: risco de efeitos graves para a saúde em caso de exposição prolongada por ingestão, R48/25
sk: Jedovatý \, nebezpečenstvo vážneho poškodenia zdravia dlhodobou expozíciou po požití, R48/25
sl: Strupeno: nevarnost hudih okvar zdravja zaradi dolgotrajnejšega zauživanja, R48/25
sv: Giftigt: risk för allvarliga hälsoskador vid långvarig exponering genom förtäring, R48/25

de: Kann Krebs erzeugen beim Einatmen, R49
en: May cause cancer by inhalation, R49
cs: Může vyvolat rakovinu při vdechování, R49
dk: Kan fremkalde kræft ved indånding, R49
el: Μπορεί να προκαλέσει καρκίνο όταν εισπνέεται, R49
es: Puede causar cáncer por inhalación, R49
et: Sissehingamisel võib põhjustada vähktõbe, R49
fi: Aiheuttaa syöpäsairauden vaaraa hengitettynä, R49
fr: Peut provoquer le cancer par inhalation, R49
hu: Belélegezve rákot okozhat (karcinogén hatású lehet), R49
it: Può provocare il cancro per inalazione, R49
lt: Gali sukelti vėžį įkvėpus, R49
lv: Ieelpojot var izraisīt ļaundabīgus audzējus, R49
mt: Jista' jikkaġuna l-kanċer meta jinxtamm, R49
nl: Kan kanker veroorzaken bij inademing, R49
no: Fare for kreft ved innånding, R49
pl: Może powodować raka w następstwie narażenia drogą oddechową, R49
pt: Pode causar cancro por inalação, R49
sk: Môže spôsobit’ rakovinu pri vdýchnutí, R49
sl: Pri vdihavanju lahko povzroči raka, R49
sv: Kan ge cancer vid inandning, R49

de: Beim Erwärmen explosionsfähig, R5
en: Heating may cause an explosion, R5
cs: Zahřívání může způsobit výbuch, R5
dk: Eksplosionsfarlig ved opvarmning, R5
el: Θέρµανση µπορεί να προκαλέσει έκρηξη, R5
es: Peligro de explosión en caso de calentamiento, R5
et: Kuumenemine võib põhjustada plahvatuse, R5
fi: Räjähdysvaarallinen kuumennettaessa, R5
fr: Danger d'explosion sous l'action de la chaleur, R5
hu: Hő hatására robbanhat, R5
it: Pericolo di esplosione per riscaldamento, R5
lt: Kaitinama gali sprogti, R5
lv: Karsēšana var izraisīt eksploziju, R5
mt: Jista' jisplodi bis-sħana, R5
nl: Ontploffingsgevaar door verwarming, R5
no: Eksplosjonsfarlig ved oppvarming, R5
pl: Ogrzanie grozi wybuchem, R5
pt: Perigo de explosão sob a acção do calor, R5
sk: Zahriatie môže spôsobit’ výbuch, R5
sl: Segrevanje lahko povzroči eksplozijo, R5
sv: Explosivt vid uppvärmning, R5

de: Sehr giftig für Wasserorganismen, R50
en: Very toxic to aquatic organisms, R50
cs: Vysoce toxický pro vodní organismy, R50
dk: Meget giftig for organismer\, der lever i vand, R50
el: Πολύ τοξικό για τους υδρόβιους οργανισµούς, R50
es: Muy tóxico para los organismos acuáticos, R50
et: Väga mürgine veeorganismidele, R50
fi: Erittäin myrkyllistä vesieliöille, R50
fr: Très toxique pour les organismes aquatiques, R50
hu: Nagyon mérgező a vízi szervezetekre, R50
it: Altamente tossico per gli organismi acquatici, R50
lt: Labai toksiška vandens organizmams, R50
lv: Ļoti toksisks ūdens organismiem, R50
mt: Tossiku ħafna għal organiżmi akwatiċi, R50
nl: Zeer vergiftig voor in het water levende organismen, R50
no: Meget giftig for vannlevende organismer, R50
pl: Działa bardzo toksycznie na organizmy wodne, R50
pt: Muito tóxico para os organismos aquáticos, R50
sk: Vel’mi jedovatý pre vodné organizmy, R50
sl: Zelo strupeno za vodne organizme, R50
sv: Mycket giftigt för vattenlevande organismer, R50

de: Sehr giftig für Wasserorganismen\, kann in Gewässern längerfristig schädliche Wirkungen haben, R50/53
en: Very toxic to aquatic organisms\, may cause long-term adverse effects in the aquatic environment, R50/53
cs: Vysoce toxický pro vodní organismy\, může vyvolat dlouhodobé nepříznivé účinky ve vodním prostředí, R50/53
dk: Meget giftig for organismer\, der lever i vand; kan forårsage uønskede langtidsvirkninger i vandmiljøet, R50/53
el: Πολύ τοξικό για τους υδρόβιους οργανισµούς\, µπορεί να προκα- λέσει µακροχρόνιες δυσµενείς επιπτώσεις στο υδάτινο περιβάλλον, R50/53
es: Muy tóxico para los organismos acuáticos\, puede provocar a largo plazo efectos negativos en el medio ambiente acuático, R50/53
et: Väga mürgine veeorganismidele\, võib põhjustada pikaajalist veekeskkonda kahjustavat toimet, R50/53
fi: Erittäin myrkyllistä vesieliöille\, voi aiheuttaa pitkäaikaisia haittavaikutuksia vesiympäristössä, R50/53
fr: Très toxique pour les organismes aquatiques\, peut entraîner des effets néfastes à long terme pour l'environnement aquatique, R50/53
hu: Nagyon mérgező a vízi szervezetekre\, a vízi környezetben hosszan tartó károsodást okozhat, R50/53
it: Altamente tossico per gli organismi acquatici\, può provocare a lungo termine effetti negativi per l'ambiente acquatico, R50/53
lt: Labai toksiška vandens organizmams\, gali sukelti ilgalaikius nepalankius vandens ekosistemų pakitimus, R50/53
lv: Ļoti toksisks ūdens organismiem\, var radīt ilgtermin¸ a nevēlamu ietekmi ūdens vidē, R50/53
mt: Tossiku ħafna għal organiżmi akwatiċi\, jista' jikkaġuna effetti hżiena għat-tul fl-ambjent akwatiku, R50/53
nl: Zeer vergiftig voor in het water levende organismen; kan in het aquatisch milieu op lange termijn schadelijke effecten veroorzaken, R50/53
no: Meget giftig for vannlevende organismer\, kan forårsake uønskede langtidsvirkninger i vannmiljøet, R50/53
pl: Działa bardzo toksycznie na organizmy wodne; może powodować długo utrzymujące się niekorzystne zmiany w środowisku wodnym, R50/53
pt: Muito tóxico para os organismos aquáticos\, podendo causar efeitos nefastos a longo prazo no ambiente aquático, R50/53
sk: Vel’mi jedovatý pre vodné organizmy\, môže spôsobit’ dlhodobé nepriaznivé účinky vo vodnej zložke životného prostredia, R50/53
sl: Zelo strupeno za vodne organizme: lahko povzroči dolgotrajne škodljive učinke na vodno okolje, R50/53
sv: Mycket giftigt för vattenlevande organismer\, kan orsaka skadliga långtidseffekter i vattenmiljön, R50/53

de: Giftig für Wasserorganismen, R51
en: Toxic to aquatic organisms, R51
cs: Toxický pro vodní organismy, R51
dk: Giftig for organismer\, der lever i vand, R51
el: Τοξικό για τους υδρόβιους οργανισµούς, R51
es: Tóxico para los organismos acuáticos, R51
et: Mürgine veeorganismidele, R51
fi: Myrkyllistä vesieliöille, R51
fr: Toxique pour les organismes aquatiques, R51
hu: Mérgező a vízi szervezetekre, R51
it: Tossico per gli organismi acquatici, R51
lt: Toksiška vandens organizmams, R51
lv: Toksisks ūdens organismiem, R51
mt: Tossiku għal organiżmi akwatiċi, R51
nl: Vergiftig voor in het water levende organismen, R51
no: Gifitg for vannlevende organismer, R51
pl: Działa toksycznie na organizmy wodne, R51
pt: Tóxico para os organismos aquáticos, R51
sk: Jedovatý pre vodné organizmy, R51
sl: Strupeno za vodne organizme, R51
sv: Giftigt för vattenlevande organismer, R51

de: Giftig für Wasserorganismen\, kann in Gewässern längerfristig schädliche Wirkungen haben, R51/53
en: Toxic to aquatic organisms\, may cause long-term adverse effects in the aquatic environment, R51/53
cs: Toxický pro vodní organismy\, může vyvolat dlouhodobé nepříznivé účinky ve vodním prostředí, R51/53
dk: Giftig for organismer\, der lever i vand; kan forårsage uønskede langtidsvirkninger i vandmiljøet, R51/53
el: Τοξικό για τους υδρόβιους οργανισµούς\, µπορεί να προκαλέσει µακροχρόνιες δυσµενείς επιπτώσεις στο υδάτινο περιβάλλον, R51/53
es: Tóxico para los organismos acuáticos\, puede provocar a largo plazo efectos negativos en el medio ambiente acuático, R51/53
et: Mürgine veeorganismidele\, võib põhjustada pikaajalist veekeskkonda kahjustavat toimet, R51/53
fi: Myrkyllistä vesieliöille\, voi aiheuttaa pitkäaikaisia haittavaikutuksia vesiympäristössä, R51/53
fr: Toxique pour les organismes aquatiques\, peut entraîner des effets néfastes à long terme pour l'environnement aquatique, R51/53
hu: Mérgező a vízi szervezetekre\, a vízi környezetben hosszan tartó károsodást okozhat, R51/53
it: Tossico per gli organismi acquatici\, può provocare a lungo termine effetti negativi per l'ambiente acquatico, R51/53
lt: Toksiška vandens organizmams\, gali sukelti ilgalaikius nepalankius vandens ekosistemų pakitimus, R51/53
lv: Toksisks ūdens organismiem\, var radīt ilglaicīgu negatīvu ietekmi ūdens vidē, R51/53
mt: Tossiku għal organiżmi akwatiċi; jista' jikkaġuna effetti ħżiena għat-tul fl-ambjent akwatiku, R51/53
nl: Vergiftig voor in het water levende organismen; kan in het aquatisch milieu op lange termijn schadelijke effecten veroorzaken, R51/53
no: Giftig for vannlevende organismer\, kan forårsake uønskede langtidsvirkninger i vannmiljøet, R51/53
pl: Działa toksycznie na organizmy wodne; może powodować długo utrzymujące się niekorzystne zmiany w środowisku wodnym, R51/53
pt: Tóxico para os organismos aquáticos\, podendo causar efeitos nefastos a longo prazo no ambiente aquático, R51/53
sk: Jedovatý pre vodné organizmy\, môže spôsobit’ dlhodobé nepriaznivé účinky vo vodnej zložke životného prostredia, R51/53
sl: Strupeno za vodne organizme: lahko povzroči dolgotrajne škodljive učinke na vodno okolje, R51/53
sv: Giftigt för vattenlevande organismer\, kan orsaka skadliga långtidseffekter i vattenmiljön, R51/53

de: Schädlich für Wasserorganismen, R52
en: Harmful to aquatic organisms, R52
cs: Škodlivý pro vodní organismy, R52
dk: Skadelig for organismer\, der lever i vand, R52
el: Επιβλαβές για τους υδρόβιους οργανισµούς, R52
es: Nocivo para los organismos acuáticos, R52
et: Kahjulik veeorganismidele, R52
fi: Haitallista vesieliöille, R52
fr: Nocif pour les organismes aquatiques, R52
hu: Ártalmas a vízi szervezetekre, R52
it: Nocivo per gli organismi acquatici, R52
lt: Kenksminga vandens organizmams, R52
lv: Kaitīgs ūdens organismiem, R52
mt: Jaħmel ħsara lil organiżmi akwatiċi, R52
nl: Schadelijk voor in het water levende organismen, R52
no: Skadelig for vannlevende organismer, R52
pl: Działa szkodliwie na organizmy wodne, R52
pt: Nocivo para os organismos aquáticos, R52
sk: Škodlivý pre vodné organizmy, R52
sl: Škodljivo za vodne organizme, R52
sv: Skadligt för vattenlevande organismer, R52

de: Schädlich für Wasserorganismen\, kann in Gewässern längerfristig schädliche Wirkungen haben, R52/53
en: Harmful to aquatic organisms\, may cause long-term adverse effects in the aquatic environment, R52/53
cs: Škodlivý pro vodní organismy\, může vyvolat dlouhodobé nepříznivé účinky ve vodním prostředí, R52/53
dk: Skadelig for organismer\, der lever i vand; kan forårsage uønskede langtidsvirkninger i vandmiljøet, R52/53
el: Επιβλαβές για τους υδρόβιους οργανισµούς\, µπορεί να προκαλέσει µακροχρόνιες δυσµενείς επιπτώσεις στο υδάτινο περιβάλλον, R52/53
es: Nocivo para los organismos acuáticos\, puede provocar a largo plazo efectos negativos en el medio ambiente acuático, R52/53
et: Kahjulik veeorganismidele\, võib põhjustada pikaajalist veekeskkonda kahjustavat toimet, R52/53
fi: Haitallista vesieliöille\, voi aiheuttaa pitkäaikaisia haittavaikutuksia vesiympäristössä, R52/53
fr: Nocif pour les organismes aquatiques\, peut entraîner des effets néfastes à long terme pour l'environnement aquatique, R52/53
hu: Ártalmas a vízi szervezetekre\, a vízi környezetben hosszan tartó károsodást okozhat, R52/53
it: Nocivo per gli organismi acquatici\, può provocare a lungo termine effetti negativi per l'ambiente acquatico, R52/53
lt: Kenksminga vandens organizmams\, gali sukelti ilgalaikius nepalankius vandens ekosistemų pakitimus, R52/53
lv: Bīstams ūdens organismiem\, var radīt ilglaicīgu negatīvu ietekmi ūdens vidē Kenksminga vandens organizmams\, gali sukelti ilgalaikius nepalankius vandens ekosistemų pakitimus, R52/53
mt: Jagħmel ħsara lil organiżmi akwatiċi\, jista' jikkaġuna effetti hżiena għat-tul fl-ambjent akwatiku, R52/53
nl: Schadelijk voor in het water levende organismen; kan in het aquatisch milieu op lange termijn schadelijke effecten veroorzaken, R52/53
no: Skadelig for vannlevende organismer\, kan forårsake uønskede langtidsvirkninger i vannmiljøet, R52/53
pl: Działa szkodliwie na organizmy wodne; może powodować długo utrzymujące się niekorzystne zmiany w środowiskuwodnym, R52/53
pt: Nocivo para os organismos aquáticos\, podendo causar efeitos nefastos a longo prazo no ambiente aquático, R52/53
sk: Škodlivý pre vodné organizmy\, môže spôsobit’ dlhodobé nepriaznivé účinky vo vodnej zložke životného prostredia, R52/53
sl: Škodljivo za vodne organizme: lahko povzroči dolgotrajne škodljive učinke na vodno okolje, R52/53
sv: Skadligt för vattenlevande organismer\, kan orsaka skadliga långtidseffekter i vattenmiljön, R52/53

de: Kann in Gewässern längerfristig schädliche Wirkungen haben, R53
en: May cause long-term adverse effects in the aquatic environment, R53
cs: Může vyvolat dlouhodobé nepříznivé účinky ve vodním prostředí, R53
dk: Kan forårsage uønskede langtidsvirkninger i vandmiljøet, R53
el: Μπορεί να προκαλέσει µακροχρόνιες δυσµενείς επιπτώσεις στο υδά- τινο περιβάλλον, R53
es: Puede provocar a largo plazo efectos negativos en el medio ambiente acuático, R53
et: Võib avaldada pikaajalist veekeskkonda kahjustavat toimet, R53
fi: Voi aiheuttaa pitkäaikaisia haittavaikutuksia vesiympäristössä, R53
fr: Peut entraîner des effets néfastes à long terme pour l'environnement aquatique, R53
hu: A vízi környezetben hosszan tartó károsodást okozhat, R53
it: Può provocare a lungo termine effetti negativi per l'ambiente acquatico, R53
lt: Gali sukelti ilgalaikius nepalankius vandens ekosistemų pakitimus, R53
lv: Var radīt ilglaicīgu negatīvu ietekmi ūdens vidē, R53
mt: Jista' jikkaġuna effetti ħżiena fit-tul lill-ambjent akwatiku, R53
nl: Kan in het aquatisch milieu op lange termijn schadelijke effecten veroorzaken, R53
no: Kan forårsake uønskede langtidsvirkninger i vannmiljøet, R53
pl: Może powodować długo utrzymujące się niekorzystne zmiany w środowisku wodnym, R53
pt: Pode causar efeitos nefastos a longo prazo no ambiente aquático, R53
sk: Môže spôsobit’ dlhodobé škodlivé účinky vo vodnej zložke životného prostredia, R53
sl: Lahko povzroči dolgotrajne škodljive učinke na vodno okolje, R53
sv: Kan orsaka skadliga långtidseffekter i vattenmiljön, R53

de: Giftig für Pflanzen, R54
en: Toxic to flora, R54
cs: Toxický pro rostliny, R54
dk: Giftig for planter, R54
el: Τοξικό για τη χλωρίδα, R54
es: Tóxico para la flora, R54
et: Mürgine taimedele, R54
fi: Myrkyllistä kasveille, R54
fr: Toxique pour la flore, R54
hu: Mérgező a növényekre, R54
it: Tossico per la flora, R54
lt: Toksiška augmenijai, R54
lv: Toksisks augiem, R54
mt: Tossiku għall-flora, R54
nl: Vergiftig voor planten, R54
no: Giftig for planter, R54
pl: Działa toksycznie na rośliny, R54
pt: Tóxico para a flora, R54
sk: Jedovatý pre flóru, R54
sl: Strupeno za rastline, R54
sv: Giftigt för växter, R54

de: Giftig für Tiere, R55
en: Toxic to fauna, R55
cs: Toxický pro živočichy, R55
dk: Giftig for dyr, R55
el: Τοξικό για την πανίδα, R55
es: Tóxico para la fauna, R55
et: Mürgine loomadele, R55
fi: Myrkyllistä eläimille, R55
fr: Toxique pour la faune, R55
hu: Mérgező az állatokra, R55
it: Tossico per la fauna, R55
lt: Toksiška gyvūnijai, R55
lv: Toksisks dzīvniekiem, R55
mt: Tossiku għall-fawna, R55
nl: Vergiftig voor dieren, R55
no: Giftig for dyr, R55
pl: Działa toksycznie na zwierzęta, R55
pt: Tóxico para a fauna, R55
sk: Jedovatý pre faunu, R55
sl: Strupeno za živali, R55
sv: Giftigt för djur, R55

de: Giftig für Bodenorganismen, R56
en: Toxic to soil organisms, R56
cs: Toxický pro půdní organismy, R56
dk: Giftig for organismer i jordbunden, R56
el: Τοξικό για τους οργανισµούς του εδάφους, R56
es: Tóxico para los organismos del suelo, R56
et: Mürgine mullaorganismidele, R56
fi: Myrkyllistä maaperäeliöille, R56
fr: Toxique pour les organismes du sol, R56
hu: Mérgező a talaj szervezeteire, R56
it: Tossico per gli organismi del terreno, R56
lt: Toksiška dirvožemio organizmams, R56
lv: Toksisks augsnes organismiem, R56
mt: Tossiku għal organiżmi tal-ħamrija, R56
nl: Vergiftig voor bodemorganismen, R56
no: Giftig for jordlevende organismer, R56
pl: Działa toksycznie na organizmy glebowe, R56
pt: Tóxico para os organismos do solo, R56
sk: Jedovatý pre pôdne organizmy, R56
sl: Strupeno za organizme v zemlji, R56
sv: Giftigt för marklevande organismer, R56

de: Giftig für Bienen, R57
en: Toxic to bees, R57
cs: Toxický pro včely, R57
dk: Giftig for bier, R57
el: Τοξικό για τις µέλισσες, R57
es: Tóxico para las abejas, R57
et: Mürgine mesilastele, R57
fi: Myrkyllistä mehiläisille, R57
fr: Toxique pour les abeilles, R57
hu: Mérgező a méhekre, R57
it: Tossico per le api, R57
lt: Toksiška bitėms, R57
lv: Toksisks bitēm, R57
mt: Tossiku għan-naħal, R57
nl: Vergiftig voor bijen, R57
no: Giftig for bier, R57
pl: Działa toksycznie na pszczoły, R57
pt: Tóxico para as abelhas, R57
sk: Jedovatý pre včely, R57
sl: Strupeno za čebele, R57
sv: Giftigt för bin, R57

de: Kann längerfristig schädliche Wirkungen auf die Umwelt haben, R58
en: May cause long-term adverse effects in the environment, R58
cs: Může vyvolat dlouhodobé nepříznivé účinky v životním prostředí, R58
dk: Kan forårsage uønskede langtidsvirkninger i miljøet, R58
el: Μπορεί να προκαλέσει µακροχρόνιες δυσµενείς επιπτώσεις στο περι- βάλλον, R58
es: Puede provocar a largo plazo efectos negativos en el medio ambiente, R58
et: Võib avaldada pikaajalist keskkonda kahjustavat toimet, R58
fi: Voi aiheuttaa pitkäaikaisia haittavaikutuksia ympäristössä, R58
fr: Peut entraîner des effets néfastes à long terme pour l'environnement, R58
hu: A környezetben hosszan tartó károsodást okozhat, R58
it: Può provocare a lungo termine effetti negativi per l'ambiente, R58
lt: Gali sukelti ilgalaikius nepalankius aplinkos pakitimus, R58
lv: Var izraisīt ilglaicīgu negatīvu ietekmi vidē, R58
mt: Jista' jikkaġuna effetti ħżiena fit-tul lill-ambjent, R58
nl: Kan in het milieu op lange termijn schadelijk effecten veroorzaken, R58
no: Kan forårsake uønskede langtidsvirkninger i miljøet, R58
pl: Może powodować długo utrzymujące się niekorzystne zmiany w środowisku, R58
pt: Pode causar efeitos nefastos a longo prazo no ambiente, R58
sk: Môže mat’ dlhodobé nepriaznivé účinky na životné prostredie, R58
sl: Lahko povzroči dolgotrajne škodljive učinke na okolje, R58
sv: Kan orsaka skadliga långtidseffekter i miljön, R58

de: Gefährlich für die Ozonschicht, R59
en: Dangerous for the ozone layer, R59
cs: Nebezpečný pro ozonovou vrstvu, R59
dk: Farlig for ozonlaget, R59
el: Επικίνδυνο για τη στιβάδα του όζοντος, R59
es: Peligroso para la capa de ozono, R59
et: Ohtlik osoonikihile, R59
fi: Vaarallista otsonikerrokselle, R59
fr: Dangereux pour la couche d'ozone, R59
hu: Veszélyes az ózonrétegre, R59
it: Pericoloso per lo strato di ozono, R59
lt: Pavojinga ozono sluoksniui, R59
lv: Bīstams ozona slānim, R59
mt: Perikoluż għas-saff ta' l-ożonu, R59
nl: Gevaarlijk voor de ozonlaag, R59
no: Farlig for ozonlaget, R59
pl: Stwarza zagrożenie dla warstwy ozonowej, R59
pt: Perigoso para a camada de ozono, R59
sk: Nebezpečný pre ozónovú vrstvu, R59
sl: Nevarno za ozonski plašč, R59
sv: Farligt för ozonskiktet, R59